Hawaii statutes.
[§353-28.5] Visits from family members. (a)
Family members shall be allowed to visit an inmate at any state
correctional facility during official visiting hours.

(b) A visit from a family member shall be
preapproved and prescheduled. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary,
preapproved and prescheduled visits for which family members have incurred
substantial costs, including but not limited to travel from a neighbor island
or the mainland, shall not be canceled due to staff absenteeism or any nonemergency
situation.

(c) The department shall develop internal
policies and procedures consistent with this section.

(d) For the purposes of this section,
"family members" means persons who are related to each other by
blood, marriage, adoption, or legal guardianship, or as reciprocal
beneficiaries. [L 2006, c 318, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next